Utah statutes.
4-24-18.   Hides and pelts -- Bill of sale to accompany purchase --
Purchaser to maintain records -- Hides and records examination and inspection.
(1) Any person who buys a hide or pelt shall secure a bill of sale from the
seller. The bill of sale shall be executed in duplicate; one copy being
retained by the seller and the other by the buyer. The bill of sale shall
specify the number of hides or pelts sold and the brand or mark borne by each
hide and pelt.
(2)  Each hide buyer within this state shall maintain a record specifying the
name and address of the seller, date of purchase, and the brands or other
identification found on the hides and pelts purchased. The hides and records
of any hide buyer are subject to examination and inspection by the department
at reasonable times and places.
